Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7731.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-21-23 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-21 entitled "Health and
Safety of Pupils" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-21-23. School safety teams, school crisis response teams, and school safety
assessments.
(a) Each school district of each town, city, and regional school department shall conduct a
school safety assessment in conjunction with local police, fire, school safety team pursuant to the
provisions of this section and any other expert said school department deems necessary. The
assessment shall examine the current status of each school building’s safety and shall be performed
within thirty (30) days of passage of this act, and every three (3) years thereafter.
(1) There shall be a Rhode Island school safety committee whose functions shall include,
but not be limited to, providing training to law enforcement, school administrators, and teachers;
collecting and reviewing all hazard safety security assessments; and offering recommendations and
assistance to each school district of every town, city, and regional school department, in an effort
to increase the safety of students and faculty. The committee shall be comprised of twelve (12)
thirteen (13) members as follows: the superintendent of the Rhode Island state police or designee,
who shall serve as chairperson of the committee; the president of the Police Chiefs’ Association,
or designee; a representative from the Rhode Island School Resource Officer Association, to be
selected by the association; the director of the Rhode Island emergency management agency, or
designee; the commissioner of the department of elementary and secondary education, or designee;

a representative from the Rhode Island School Superintendents’ Association, to be selected by the
association; the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and
hospitals, or designee; the state fire marshal, or designee; a representative of the Rhode Island
Association of School Maintenance Directors, to be selected by the association; a representative
from the Rhode Island Association of School Principals, to be selected by the association; a
representative from the Rhode Island Association of School Committees, to be selected by the
association; a representative from the National Education Association of Rhode Island (“NEARI”),
who shall be a full-time classroom teacher, to be selected by the president of NEARI; and one
representative from the Rhode Island Federation of Teachers and Health Professionals
(“RIFTHP”), who shall be a full-time classroom teacher, to be selected by the president of the
RIFTHP.
(2) Each school department of each town, city, and regional school district shall complete
the emergency action plan and shall submit the all hazards site safety survey report to the Rhode
Island school safety committee every three (3) years for the committee’s review and
recommendation.
(3) The assessment shall be completed by November 1 of the year mandated, and by
December 31 of that year, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall report to
the speaker of the house, the senate president, and the governor that the assessments have been
completed. Assessments performed within a year of the date of passage of this act shall satisfy this
requirement.
(4) All meetings regarding the school safety assessment are not subject to the open
meetings law pursuant to chapter 46 of title 42, and documents produced including, but not limited
to, meeting minutes and the school safety assessment are not subject to the access to public records
law pursuant to chapter 2 of title 38.
(b) The school committee of each town, city, and regional school department shall review
and adopt in executive session a comprehensive school safety plan regarding crisis intervention,
emergency response, and management. The plan shall be developed by a school safety team
comprised of representatives of the school committee; representatives of student, teacher, and
parent organizations; school safety personnel; school administration; and members of local law
enforcement, fire, and emergency personnel. Members of the school safety team shall be appointed
by the school committee and/or school superintendent of the town, city, or regional school district.
In creating the school safety plan, the school safety team(s) shall consult the model school safety
plan developed by the department of elementary and secondary education pursuant to § 16-21-23.1.
(c) The school crisis response team shall be comprised of those selected school personnel
LC005131/SUB A - Page 2 of 4

willing to serve as members of a psychological response team to address the psychological and
emotional needs of the school community, and may seek mental health resources from the
department of elementary and secondary education. Members of the school crisis response team
may coordinate mental health services for those students and school employees affected by acts of
violence in the schools, using resources available through the department of elementary and
secondary education.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005131/SUB A
========
LC005131/SUB A - Page 3 of 4